test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NID_I_NoExtra_nagizh_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     nagizh: nagizh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1nagizh: ninagizh
     +Px2nagizh: ginagizh
     +Px3nagizh: onagizh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     nagizh+Dim: nagizhens
     nagizh+Con: nagizhenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     nagizh+Pos: nagizhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     nagizh+Pej: nagizhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     nagizh+Pos1Pl: nagizhinaan
     nagizh+PosPl: nagizhiwaa
     nagizh+PosObv: nagizhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     nagizh+Pret: nagizhiban
     nagizh+VocPl: nagizh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     nagizh+Obv: nagizhan
     nagizh+Pl: nagizhag
     nagizh+Loc: nagizhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1nagizh+Dim: ninagizhens
     +Px1nagizh+Con: ninagizhenh
     +Px2nagizh+Dim: ginagizhens
     +Px2nagizh+Con: ginagizhenh
     +Px3nagizh+Dim: onagizhens
     +Px3nagizh+Con: onagizhenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1nagizh+Pos: ninagizhim
     +Px2nagizh+Pos: ginagizhim
     +Px3nagizh+Pos: onagizhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1nagizh+Pej: ninagizhish
     +Px2nagizh+Pej: ginagizhish
     +Px3nagizh+Pej: onagizhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1nagizh+Pos1Pl: ninagizhinaan
     +Px1nagizh+PosPl: ninagizhiwaa
     +Px1nagizh+PosObv: ninagizhini
     +Px2nagizh+Pos1Pl: ginagizhinaan
     +Px2nagizh+PosPl: ginagizhiwaa
     +Px2nagizh+PosObv: ginagizhini
     +Px3nagizh+Pos1Pl: onagizhinaan
     +Px3nagizh+PosPl: onagizhiwaa
     +Px3nagizh+PosObv: onagizhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1nagizh+Pret: ninagizhiban
     +Px1nagizh+VocPl: ninagizh***idig, idog***
     +Px2nagizh+Pret: ginagizhiban
     +Px2nagizh+VocPl: ginagizh***idig, idog***
     +Px3nagizh+Pret: onagizhiban
     +Px3nagizh+VocPl: onagizh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1nagizh+Obv: ninagizhan
     +Px1nagizh+Pl: ninagizhag
     +Px1nagizh+Loc: ninagizhing
     +Px2nagizh+Obv: ginagizhan
     +Px2nagizh+Pl: ginagizhag
     +Px2nagizh+Loc: ginagizhing
     +Px3nagizh+Obv: onagizhan
     +Px3nagizh+Pl: onagizhag
     +Px3nagizh+Loc: onagizhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     nagizh+Dim+Pos: nagizhensim
     nagizh+Con+Pos: nagizhenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     nagizh+Dim+Pej: nagizhensish
     nagizh+Con+Pej: nagizhenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     nagizh+Dim+Pos1Pl: nagizhensinaan
     nagizh+Dim+PosPl: nagizhensiwaa
     nagizh+Dim+PosObv: nagizhensini
     nagizh+Con+Pos1Pl: nagizhenhinaan
     nagizh+Con+PosPl: nagizhenhiwaa
     nagizh+Con+PosObv: nagizhenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     nagizh+Dim+Pret: nagizhensiban
     nagizh+Dim+VocPl: nagizhens***idig, idog***
     nagizh+Con+Pret: nagizhenhiban
     nagizh+Con+VocPl: nagizhenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     nagizh+Dim+Obv: nagizhensan
     nagizh+Dim+Pl: nagizhensag
     nagizh+Dim+Loc: nagizhensing
     nagizh+Con+Obv: nagizhenhan
     nagizh+Con+Pl: nagizhenhag
     nagizh+Con+Loc: nagizhenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     nagizh+Pos+Pej: nagizhimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl: nagizhiminaan
     nagizh+Pos+PosPl: nagizhimiwaa
     nagizh+Pos+PosObv: nagizhimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     nagizh+Pos+Pret: nagizhimiban
     nagizh+Pos+VocPl: nagizhim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     nagizh+Pos+Obv: nagizhiman
     nagizh+Pos+Pl: nagizhimag
     nagizh+Pos+Loc: nagizhiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl: nagizhishinaan
     nagizh+Pej+PosPl: nagizhishiwaa
     nagizh+Pej+PosObv: nagizhishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     nagizh+Pej+Pret: nagizhishiban
     nagizh+Pej+VocPl: nagizhish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     nagizh+Pej+Obv: nagizhishan
     nagizh+Pej+Pl: nagizhishag
     nagizh+Pej+Loc: nagizhishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     nagizh+Pos1Pl+Pret: nagizhinaaniban
     nagizh+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nagizhinaan***idig, idog***
     nagizh+PosPl+Pret: nagizhiwaaiban
     nagizh+PosPl+VocPl: nagizhiwaa***idig, idog***
     nagizh+PosObv+Pret: nagizhiniiban
     nagizh+PosObv+VocPl: nagizhini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     nagizh+Pos1Pl+Obv: nagizhinaanan
     nagizh+Pos1Pl+Pl: nagizhinaanag
     nagizh+Pos1Pl+Loc: nagizhinaaning
     nagizh+PosPl+Obv: nagizhiwaaan
     nagizh+PosPl+Pl: nagizhiwaaag
     nagizh+PosPl+Loc: nagizhiwaaing
     nagizh+PosObv+Obv: nagizhinian
     nagizh+PosObv+Pl: nagizhiniag
     nagizh+PosObv+Loc: nagizhiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     nagizh+Pret+Obv: nagizhibanan
     nagizh+Pret+Pl: nagizhibanag
     nagizh+Pret+Loc: nagizhibaning
     nagizh+VocPl+Obv: nagizh***idig, idog***an
     nagizh+VocPl+Pl: nagizh***idig, idog***ag
     nagizh+VocPl+Loc: nagizh***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos: ninagizhensim
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos: ninagizhenhim
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos: ginagizhensim
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos: ginagizhenhim
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos: onagizhensim
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos: onagizhenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pej: ninagizhensish
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pej: ninagizhenhish
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pej: ginagizhensish
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pej: ginagizhenhish
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pej: onagizhensish
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pej: onagizhenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos1Pl: ninagizhensinaan
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+PosPl: ninagizhensiwaa
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+PosObv: ninagizhensini
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos1Pl: ninagizhenhinaan
     +Px1nagizh+Con+PosPl: ninagizhenhiwaa
     +Px1nagizh+Con+PosObv: ninagizhenhini
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos1Pl: ginagizhensinaan
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+PosPl: ginagizhensiwaa
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+PosObv: ginagizhensini
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos1Pl: ginagizhenhinaan
     +Px2nagizh+Con+PosPl: ginagizhenhiwaa
     +Px2nagizh+Con+PosObv: ginagizhenhini
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos1Pl: onagizhensinaan
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+PosPl: onagizhensiwaa
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+PosObv: onagizhensini
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos1Pl: onagizhenhinaan
     +Px3nagizh+Con+PosPl: onagizhenhiwaa
     +Px3nagizh+Con+PosObv: onagizhenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pret: ninagizhensiban
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+VocPl: ninagizhens***idig, idog***
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pret: ninagizhenhiban
     +Px1nagizh+Con+VocPl: ninagizhenh***idig, idog***
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pret: ginagizhensiban
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+VocPl: ginagizhens***idig, idog***
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pret: ginagizhenhiban
     +Px2nagizh+Con+VocPl: ginagizhenh***idig, idog***
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pret: onagizhensiban
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+VocPl: onagizhens***idig, idog***
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pret: onagizhenhiban
     +Px3nagizh+Con+VocPl: onagizhenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Obv: ninagizhensan
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pl: ninagizhensag
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Loc: ninagizhensing
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Obv: ninagizhenhan
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pl: ninagizhenhag
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Loc: ninagizhenhing
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Obv: ginagizhensan
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pl: ginagizhensag
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Loc: ginagizhensing
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Obv: ginagizhenhan
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pl: ginagizhenhag
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Loc: ginagizhenhing
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Obv: onagizhensan
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pl: onagizhensag
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Loc: onagizhensing
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Obv: onagizhenhan
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pl: onagizhenhag
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Loc: onagizhenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+Pej: ninagizhimish
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+Pej: ginagizhimish
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pej: onagizhimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl: ninagizhiminaan
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+PosPl: ninagizhimiwaa
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+PosObv: ninagizhimini
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl: ginagizhiminaan
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+PosPl: ginagizhimiwaa
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+PosObv: ginagizhimini
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl: onagizhiminaan
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+PosPl: onagizhimiwaa
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+PosObv: onagizhimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+Pret: ninagizhimiban
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+VocPl: ninagizhim***idig, idog***
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+Pret: ginagizhimiban
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+VocPl: ginagizhim***idig, idog***
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pret: onagizhimiban
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+VocPl: onagizhim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+Obv: ninagizhiman
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+Pl: ninagizhimag
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+Loc: ninagizhiming
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+Obv: ginagizhiman
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+Pl: ginagizhimag
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+Loc: ginagizhiming
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Obv: onagizhiman
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pl: onagizhimag
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Loc: onagizhiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl: ninagizhishinaan
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+PosPl: ninagizhishiwaa
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+PosObv: ninagizhishini
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl: ginagizhishinaan
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+PosPl: ginagizhishiwaa
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+PosObv: ginagizhishini
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl: onagizhishinaan
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+PosPl: onagizhishiwaa
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+PosObv: onagizhishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+Pret: ninagizhishiban
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+VocPl: ninagizhish***idig, idog***
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+Pret: ginagizhishiban
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+VocPl: ginagizhish***idig, idog***
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+Pret: onagizhishiban
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+VocPl: onagizhish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+Obv: ninagizhishan
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+Pl: ninagizhishag
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+Loc: ninagizhishing
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+Obv: ginagizhishan
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+Pl: ginagizhishag
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+Loc: ginagizhishing
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+Obv: onagizhishan
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+Pl: onagizhishag
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+Loc: onagizhishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     +Px1nagizh+Pos1Pl+Pret: ninagizhinaaniban
     +Px1nagizh+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ninagizhinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1nagizh+PosPl+Pret: ninagizhiwaaiban
     +Px1nagizh+PosPl+VocPl: ninagizhiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1nagizh+PosObv+Pret: ninagizhiniiban
     +Px1nagizh+PosObv+VocPl: ninagizhini***idig, idog***
     +Px2nagizh+Pos1Pl+Pret: ginagizhinaaniban
     +Px2nagizh+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ginagizhinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2nagizh+PosPl+Pret: ginagizhiwaaiban
     +Px2nagizh+PosPl+VocPl: ginagizhiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2nagizh+PosObv+Pret: ginagizhiniiban
     +Px2nagizh+PosObv+VocPl: ginagizhini***idig, idog***
     +Px3nagizh+Pos1Pl+Pret: onagizhinaaniban
     +Px3nagizh+Pos1Pl+VocPl: onagizhinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3nagizh+PosPl+Pret: onagizhiwaaiban
     +Px3nagizh+PosPl+VocPl: onagizhiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3nagizh+PosObv+Pret: onagizhiniiban
     +Px3nagizh+PosObv+VocPl: onagizhini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     +Px1nagizh+Pos1Pl+Obv: ninagizhinaanan
     +Px1nagizh+Pos1Pl+Pl: ninagizhinaanag
     +Px1nagizh+Pos1Pl+Loc: ninagizhinaaning
     +Px1nagizh+PosPl+Obv: ninagizhiwaaan
     +Px1nagizh+PosPl+Pl: ninagizhiwaaag
     +Px1nagizh+PosPl+Loc: ninagizhiwaaing
     +Px1nagizh+PosObv+Obv: ninagizhinian
     +Px1nagizh+PosObv+Pl: ninagizhiniag
     +Px1nagizh+PosObv+Loc: ninagizhiniing
     +Px2nagizh+Pos1Pl+Obv: ginagizhinaanan
     +Px2nagizh+Pos1Pl+Pl: ginagizhinaanag
     +Px2nagizh+Pos1Pl+Loc: ginagizhinaaning
     +Px2nagizh+PosPl+Obv: ginagizhiwaaan
